Utah statutes.
19-6-704.   Powers and duties of the board.
(1)  The board shall make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary to administer this part and to
comply with 40 CFR 279, Standards for the Management of Used Oil, to ensure
the state's primacy to manage used oil under 40 CFR 279. For these purposes
the board shall:
(a) (i)  receive a proposed dispositive action from an administrative law
judge as provided by Section 19-1-301; and
(ii) (A)  approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a proposed
dispositive action; or
(B)  return the proposed dispositive action to the administrative law judge
for further action as directed;
(b)  establish by rule conditions and procedures for registration and
revocation of registration as a used oil collection center, used oil
aggregation point, or DIYer used oil collection center;
(c)  provide by rule that used oil aggregation points that do not accept DIYer
used oil are required to comply with used oil collection standards under this
part, but are not required to be permitted or registered;
(d)  establish by rule conditions and fees required to obtain permits and
operate as used oil transporters, used oil transfer facilities, used oil
processors and rerefiners, and used oil fuel marketers;
(e)  establish by rule the amount of liability insurance or other financial
responsibility the applicant shall have to qualify for a permit under
Subsection (1)(d);
(f)  establish by rule the form and amount of reclamation surety required for
reclamation of any site or facility required to be permitted under this part;
(g)  after public notice and opportunity for a public hearing, hear and act on
permit issues appealed under Subsection 19-6-712(2);
(h)  establish by rule standards for tracking, analysis, and recordkeeping
regarding used oil subject to regulation under this part, including:
(i)  manifests for handling and transferring used oil;
(ii)  analyses necessary to determine if used oil is on-specification or off-
specification;
(iii)  records documenting date, quantities, and character of used oil
transported, processed, transferred, or sold;
(iv)  records documenting persons between whom transactions under this
subsection occurred; and
(v)  exemption of DIYer used oil collection centers from this subsection
except as necessary to verify volumes of used oil picked up by a permitted
transporter and the transporter's name and federal EPA identification number;
(i)  authorize inspections and audits of facilities, centers, and operations
subject to regulation under this part;
(j)  establish by rule standards for:
(i)  used oil generators;
(ii)  used oil collection centers;
(iii)  DIYer used oil collection centers;
(iv)  aggregation points;
(v)  curbside used oil collection programs;
(vi)  used oil transporters;
(vii)  used oil transfer facilities;
(viii)  used oil burners;
(ix)  used oil processors and rerefiners; and
(x)  used oil marketers;
(k)  establish by rule standards for determining on-specification and off-
specification used oil and specified mixtures of used oil, subject to Section
19-6-707 regarding rebuttable presumptions;
(l)  establish by rule standards for closure, remediation, and response to
releases involving used oil; and
(m)  establish a public education program to promote used oil recycling and
use of used oil collection centers.
(2)  The board may:
(a) (i)  hold a hearing that is not an adjudicative proceeding relating to any
aspect of or matter in the administration of this part and compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and other evidence,
administer oaths and take testimony, and receive evidence as necessary;
(ii)  receive a proposed dispositive action from an administrative law judge
as provided by Section 19-1-301; and
(iii) (A)  approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove a proposed
dispositive action; or
(B)  return the proposed dispositive action to the administrative law judge
for further action as directed;
(b)  require retention and submission of records required under this part; and
(c)  require audits of records and recordkeeping procedures required under
this part and rules made under this part, except that audits of records
regarding the fee imposed and collected by the commission under Sections
19-6-714 and 19-6-715 are the responsibility of the commission under Section
19-6-716.
